Utah statutes.
61-2-17.   Penalty for violation of chapter.
(1) (a)  An individual required to be licensed under this chapter who violates
this chapter, in addition to being subject to a license sanction or a fine
ordered by the commission, is, upon conviction of a first violation, guilty of
a class A misdemeanor.  For a conviction under this Subsection (1)(a),
imprisonment shall be for a term not to exceed six months.
(b)  If a violator of this chapter is a corporation, the corporation is, upon
conviction of a first violation, guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(2) (a)  Upon conviction of a second or subsequent violation, an individual is
guilty of a third degree felony.  Imprisonment for a conviction under this
Subsection (2)(a) shall be for a term not to exceed two years.
(b)  If a corporation is convicted of a second or subsequent violation, the
corporation is guilty of a third degree felony.
(3)  An officer or agent of a corporation, or a member or agent of a
partnership or association, who personally participates in or is an accessory
to any violation of this chapter by the corporation, partnership, or
association, is subject to the penalties prescribed for an individual.
(4)  If a person receives money or its equivalent, as commission,
compensation, or profit by or in consequence of a violation of this chapter,
that person is liable for an additional penalty of not less than the amount of
the money received and not more than three times the amount of money received,
as may be determined by the court.  This penalty may be sued for in any court
of competent jurisdiction, and recovered by any person aggrieved for the
person's own use and benefit.
(5)  A fine imposed by the commission and the director under this chapter
shall, notwithstanding Section 13-1-2, be deposited into the Real Estate
Education, Research, and Recovery Fund to be used in a manner consistent with
the requirements of Chapter 2a, Real Estate Recovery Fund Act.
